Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.450

Factory built housing and commercial structures, regulating installation of—Definitions.

Whenever used in RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490:

(1) "Department" means the Washington state department of labor and industries;

(2) "Approved" means approved by the department;

(3) "Factory built housing" means any structure, including a factory built tiny house with or without a chassis (wheels), designed primarily for human occupancy other than a manufactured or mobile home the structure or any room of which is either entirely or substantially prefabricated or assembled at a place other than a building site;

(4) "Install" means the assembly of factory built housing or factory built commercial structures at a building site;

(5) "Building site" means any tract, parcel or subdivision of land upon which factory built housing or a factory built commercial structure is installed or is to be installed;

(6) "Local enforcement agency" means any agency of the governing body of any city, county, or state which enforces laws or ordinances governing the construction of buildings;

(7) "Commercial structure" means a structure designed or used for human habitation, or human occupancy for industrial, educational, assembly, professional or commercial purposes;

(8) "Qualified inspection agency" means a nongovernmental entity approved to perform inspections under contract for the department.

[ 2019 c 352 s 4; 2019 c 165 s 2; 2001 c 335 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 22 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 44 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2019 c 165 s 2 and by 2019 c 352 s 4, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Finding—2019 c 352: See note following RCW 58.17.040.

Application—2001 c 335: See note following RCW 43.22.335.